Idaho, session 2026, H0887.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-7024, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-7024. WATER SKIING. (1) It Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, it shall be unlawful for the operator of any vessel having in
tow or otherwise assisting a person on water skis, aquaplane or a similar
contrivance to operate or propel the same upon on or above any waters of the
state of Idaho unless that vessel shall be occupied by at least one (1) other
competent person who shall act as an observer. This subsection shall not ap-
ply to vessels used by representatives of duly constituted water ski schools
in the giving of instruction or to vessels used in duly authorized water ski
tournaments, competitions, expositions, or trials.
(2) Vessels having in tow or otherwise assisting a person on water skis
or a similar contrivance to operate or propel the same on or above any waters
of the state of Idaho shall be exempt from the observer requirement provided
for in subsection (1) of this section if the vessel has a large mirror that is
firmly mounted in a position that allows the operator to face the direction
of travel and observe the person being towed at all times, and:
(2) (a) Vessels The vessel is operating within a regulation legal and
permitted slalom course and that are equipped with a rearview wide-an-
gle mirror are exempt from the requirement of having at least one (1)
other competent person in the boat acting as an observer as provided in
subsection (1) of this section. The size of the mirror must be no less
than four (4) inches from bottom to top and across from side to side. It
shall be mounted firmly to give the operator a full, complete view be-
yond the rear of the vessel at all times.; or
(b) The vessel is being operated between one (1) hour prior to sunrise
and 9:00 a.m. from May 15 through September 10 of each year or at any
time of day from September 11 through May 14 of each year.
(3) No Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no ves-
sel shall have in tow or shall otherwise be assisting a person on water skis,
aquaplane or a similar contrivance from the period of one (1) hour after sun-
set to one (1) hour prior to sunrise. This subsection shall not apply to ves-
sels used in duly authorized water ski tournaments, competitions, exposi-
tions, or trials.
(4) All vessels having in tow or otherwise assisting a person on water
skis, aquaplane or a similar contrivance shall be operated in a careful and


prudent manner and at a reasonable distance from persons and property so as
not to endanger the life or property of any person or create excessive wake.
(5) No person shall operate or manipulate any vessel's attached towrope
or other device by which the direction or location of water skis, aquaplane
or a similar device may be affected or controlled in such a way as to cause
the same or any person thereon to collide with or strike against any person or
object other than a jumping ramp or in conjunction with skiing over a slalom
course.
(6) No person may operate or permit to be operated any vessel used for
towing water-skiers or devices in which persons or objects are being towed
above, in, or on the waters of this state unless it has on board and displays a
warning flag that must be international orange or red in color and must be at
least one (1) foot square. When any person being towed by the vessel becomes
disengaged from the towline and is down in the water, a person in the vessel
must immediately hold the warning flag aloft, visible from all sides, as an
indicator to other vessels in the area that a person is down in the water. As
long as such downed person is in the water, the flag must remain displayed to
prevent danger to that person and hazards to passing vessels. Such warning
flag must be displayed only under these conditions or when other eminent dan-
ger exists.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.